Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-518
Delinquent assessments; interest; limit.

No special assessment levied for the purpose aforesaid shall draw interest at a rate exceeding nine percent per annum from the date of delinquency until paid.

Laws 1927, c. 144, § 2, p. 392;

C.S.1929, § 31-612;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 26, p. 539;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 31-612;

R.S.1943, § 31-518.